Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-417.01
Utilization-of-funds member, defined.

Utilization-of-funds member shall mean a member of the organization who shall be responsible for supervising the conduct of a lottery or raffle and for the proper utilization of the gross proceeds derived from the conduct of a lottery or raffle.

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 100.